Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Ground-Fault Circuit Interrupter

227.800.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

227.800

to

227.810

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Fountain” means all devices that artificially produce or contain a jet or stream of water;

“Ground-fault circuit-interrupter” means a device intended for the protection of the general public that functions to deenergize a circuit or a portion thereof within an established period of time when a current to ground exceeds a predetermined value that is less than that required to operate the overcurrent protective device of the supply circuit;

“Pool” means all swimming, wading, therapeutic, decorative, ornamental, display, and reflection pools; hot tubs; spas; and hydromassage bathtubs, whether permanently installed or storable; and

“Public place” means any building, structure, or location that is accessible to the general public for business, civic, educational, political, religious, recreational, social, or travel purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 6, § 1, effective January 1, 1993; 2010, ch. 24, § 427, effective July 15, 2010.

227.810.
Requirement for ground-fault circuit-interrupter installation on public fountains and pools — Standards to be adopted by administrative regulations — Prohibition of exemption by local governmental action.

A ground-fault circuit-interrupter shall be installed on all existing and new fountains and pools that are located in a public place within the Commonwealth, in accordance with standards set forth in the National Electrical Code adopted by administrative regulations of the department.

A state or local government agency shall not promulgate an administrative regulation or ordinance to exempt any fountain or pool located in a public place from the required installation of a ground-fault circuit-interrupter, regardless of the age of construction of the fountain or pool.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 6, § 2, effective January 1, 1993; 2010, ch. 24, § 428, effective July 15, 2010.